Utah statutes.
17C-1-508.   Bonds exempt from taxes -- Agency may purchase its own bonds.
(1)  A bond issued by an agency under this part is issued for an essential
public and governmental purpose and is, together with interest on the bond and
income from it, exempt from all state taxes except the corporate franchise
tax.
(2)  An agency may purchase its own bonds at a price that its board
determines.
(3)  Nothing in this section may be construed to limit the right of an obligee
to pursue a remedy for the enforcement of a pledge or lien given under this
part by an agency on its rents, fees, grants, properties, or revenues.
